Utah statutes.
58-37-7.   Labeling and packaging controlled substance.
(1)  A person licensed pursuant to this act may not distribute a controlled
substance unless it is packaged and labeled in compliance with the
requirements of Section 305 of the Federal Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention
and Control Act of 1970.
(2)  No person except a pharmacist for the purpose of filling a prescription
shall alter, deface, or remove any label affixed by the manufacturer.
(3)  Whenever a pharmacist sells or dispenses any controlled substance on a
prescription issued by a practitioner, he shall affix to the container in
which the substance is sold or dispensed:
(a)  a label showing the:
(i)  pharmacy name and address;
(ii)  serial number; and
(iii)  date of initial filling;
(b)  the prescription number, the name of the patient, or if the patient is an
animal, the name of the owner of the animal and the species of the animal;
(c)  the name of the practitioner by whom the prescription was written;
(d)  any directions stated on the prescription; and
(e)  any directions required by rules and regulations promulgated by the
department.
(4)  A person may not alter the face or remove any label so long as any of the
original contents remain.
(5) (a)  An individual to whom or for whose use any controlled substance has
been prescribed, sold, or dispensed by a practitioner and the owner of any
animal for which any controlled substance has been prescribed, sold, or
dispensed by a veterinarian may lawfully possess it only in the container in
which it was delivered to him by the person selling or dispensing it.
(b)  It is a defense to a prosecution under this subsection that the person
being prosecuted produces in court a valid prescription for the controlled
substance or the original container with the label attached.
